Hawaii statutes.
[§8-18] Filipino-American History Month. The
month of October shall be known and designated as "Filipino-American
History Month". The month of October shall commemorate the contributions
of Filipino-Americans to the history and heritage of Hawaii and the United
States. This month is not and shall not be construed as a state holiday. [L
2008, c 15, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next